California, session 20252026, AB2159.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact future legislation that would do all of the following:(a) Require the State Department of Education to develop cyberbullying education, counseling, or trainings that a local educational agency may access.(b) For a pupil who engages in repeated acts of cyberbullying or is suspended for cyberbullying, require the pupil and the pupil’s parent or guardian to participate in a program of rehabilitative cyberbullying education, counseling, or training.(c) Require local educational agencies to report to the department the name of a pupil and the pupil’s parent or guardian that has been required to participate in a program pursuant to subdivision (b) and report whether the program was completed.(d) For a pupil’s parent or guardian that fails to complete participating in a program pursuant to subdivision (b), require the department to issue a notice of noncompliance to the parent or guardian and issue a citation and fine if noncompliance continues after notice.